Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB360.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2002-J(a) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 2002-J. Policy for postsecondary institution sexual harassment and sexual violence.(a) Adoption.--A postsecondary institution shall adopt a clear, understandable written policy on sexual harassment and sexual violence that informs victims of their rights under 12345678910111213141516171819 Federal and State law, including the crime victims bill of rights. The policy shall meet or exceed the standards set in the model policy under subsection (c).* * *( b.1) Investigation.--A postsecondary institution shall investigate an incident of sexual harassment or sexual violence following the timeline established in the policy under subsection (a).( b.2) Protection.--The sexual harassment and sexual violence policy under subsection (a) shall include protections to be provided to a witness or victim of an incident of sexual harassment or sexual violence while an investigation is ongoing.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0360PN0314 - 2 - 1234567891011121314